New York, session 2025-2026, S1515.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (g) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 3-c of the general municipal law, as added by section 1 of part 3 A of chapter 97 of the laws of 2011, is amended and a new subparagraph 4 (v) is added to read as follows: 5 (iv) in years in which the normal contribution rate of the New York 6 state teachers' retirement system, as defined by paragraph a of subdivi- 7 sion two of section five hundred seventeen of the education law, 8 increases by more than two percentage points from the previous year, a 9 tax levy necessary for expenditures for the coming fiscal year for local 10 government employer contributions to the New York state teachers' 11 retirement system caused by growth in the normal contribution rate minus 12 two percentage points[.]; 13 (v) a tax levy necessary for expenditures for emergency medical 14 services. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04172-01-5